California, session 20252026, AB2359.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 14002 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:14002. Health care granted under the provisions of this chapter is held subject to the provisions of any a later enacted law hereafter enacted amending, repealing, or supplementing in whole or in part the provisions of this chapter, and subject to the rules and regulations of the department. No A recipient of health care under this chapter shall not have any a claim for compensation or otherwise because his the service is affected in any way by any such by the amending, repealing, or supplemental act, or by any such by a rule or regulation regulation, or by any an addition, amendment, or repeal of such the rules or regulations.